North Dakota, session 69, HB1061.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 17 of section 12.1-34-02 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
17. Prompt notice of custodial release. Registered victims and witnesses must be informed
whenever a criminal defendant receives a temporary, provisional, or final release from custody
or whenever the defendant escapes from custody. Victims who are not registered must be
given the same notice by the appropriate custodial authority. Notification must include the
transfer of the defendant to a work-release or education release program, a community
residential program, or transfer to a mental health facility. All notices to the registered victim
and witnesses concerning this release information must be within a reasonable time prior to
the defendant's release or transfer. The notice given by the custodial authority must be given
by any means reasonably calculated to give prompt notice.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Subsection 18 of section 12.1-34-02 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
18. Participation in parole board and pardon decision. Victims may submit a written statement for
consideration by the parole board, the governor, or the pardon advisory board, if one has been
appointed, prior to the parole board, the governor, or the pardon advisory board taking any
action on a defendant's request for parole or pardon. A victim statement made under this
subsection is a confidential record and may be disclosed only to the parole board, the
governor, the pardon advisory board, or their authorized representative. Victims of violent
crimes may at the discretion of the parole board, the governor, or the pardon advisory board
personally appear and address the parole board, the governor, or the pardon advisory board.
Victim testimony and written statements under this subsection are confidential and may be
disclosed only to the parole board, the governor, the pardon advisory board, or their
authorized representative. Notice must be given by the parole board or, pardon clerk, or
authorized representative informing the registered victim of the pending review. The registered
victim must be provided notice of the decision of the parole board or of the governor and the
recommendations of the pardon advisory board, if any, and, if applicable, notice of the date of
the prisoner's release on parole or the prisoner's pardon, conditional pardon, reprieve,
commutation, or remission of fine. Notice must be given within a reasonable time after the
parole board or the governor makes a decision but in any event before the parolee's or
pardoned prisoner's release from custody.

H. B. NO. 1061 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1061.
House Vote: Yeas 86 Nays 2 Absent 6
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State